Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.140

Criminal profiteering lien—Procedures after notice.

(1) The term of a lien notice shall be six years from the date the lien notice is recorded. If a renewal lien notice is filed by the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney, the term of the renewal lien notice shall be for six years from the date the renewal lien notice is recorded. The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney is entitled to only one renewal of the lien notice.

(2) The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien notice may release in whole or in part any lien notice or may release any specific property or beneficial interest from the lien notice upon such terms and conditions as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney considers appropriate and shall release any lien upon the dismissal of the action which is the basis of the lien or satisfaction of the judgment of the court in the action or other final disposition of the claim evidenced by the lien. A release of a lien notice executed by the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney shall be recorded in the official records in which the lien notice covering that property was recorded. No charge or fee may be imposed for recording any release of a lien notice.

(3)(a) A person named in the lien notice may move the court in which the civil proceeding giving rise to the lien notice is pending for an order extinguishing the lien notice.

(b) Upon the motion of a person under (a) of this subsection, the court immediately shall enter an order setting a date for hearing, which shall be not less than five nor more than ten days after the motion is filed. The order and a copy of the motion shall be served on the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney within three days after the entry of the court's order. At the hearing, the court shall take evidence on the issue of whether any property or beneficial interest owned by the person is covered by the lien notice or otherwise subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.120. If the person shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the lien notice is not applicable to the person or that any property or beneficial interest owned by the person is not subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.120, the court shall enter a judgment extinguishing the lien notice or releasing the property or beneficial interest from the lien notice.

(c) The court may enter an order releasing from the lien notice any specific real property or beneficial interest if, at the time the lien notice is recorded, there is pending an arms length sale of the real property or beneficial interest in which the parties are under no undue compulsion to sell or buy and are able, willing, and reasonably well informed and the sale is for the fair market value of the real property or beneficial interest and the recording of the lien notice prevents the sale of the property or interest. The proceeds resulting from the sale of the real property or beneficial interest shall be deposited with the court, subject to the further order of the court.

(d) At any time after filing of a lien, the court may release from the lien any property upon application by the defendant and posting of security equal to the value of the property to be released.

[ 2001 c 222 s 18. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 15; 1984 c 270 s 14.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.